Illinois, session 104th, SB3751.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rebuild Illinois Mental Health Workforce 5Act is amended by changing Section 20-10 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 66/20-10)7    Sec. 20-10. Medicaid funding for community mental health 8services. Medicaid funding for the specific community mental 9health services listed in this Act shall be adjusted and paid 10as set forth in this Act. Such payments shall be paid in 11addition to the base Medicaid reimbursement rate and add-on 12payment rates per service unit. 13    (a) The following payment adjustments shall begin on July 141, 2022 for State Fiscal Year 2023 and shall continue for every 15State fiscal year thereafter.16        (1) Individual Therapy Medicaid Payment rate for 17    services provided under the H0004 Code:18            (A) The Medicaid total payment rate for individual 19        therapy provided by a qualified mental health 20        professional shall be increased by no less than $9 per 21        service unit. 22            (B) The Medicaid total payment rate for individual 23        therapy provided by a mental health professional shall   SB3751- 2 -LRB104 20592 KTG 34082 b1        be increased by no less than $9 per service unit.2        (2) Community Support - Individual Medicaid Payment 3    rate for services provided under the H2015 Code: All 4    community support - individual services shall be increased 5    by no less than $15 per service unit.6        (3) Case Management Medicaid Add-on Payment for 7    services provided under the T1016 code: All case 8    management services rates shall be increased by no less 9    than $15 per service unit.10        (4) Assertive Community Treatment Medicaid Add-on 11    Payment for services provided under the H0039 code: The 12    Medicaid total payment rate for assertive community 13    treatment services shall increase by no less than $8 per 14    service unit.15    (b) (5) Medicaid user-based directed payments. The 16following directed payments shall be paid to qualifying 17providers for State Fiscal Year 2023 through State Fiscal Year 182026. 19        (1) (A) For each State fiscal year, a monthly directed 20    payment shall be paid to a community mental health 21    provider of community support team services based on the 22    number of Medicaid users of community support team 23    services documented by Medicaid fee-for-service and 24    managed care encounter claims delivered by that provider 25    in the base year. The Department of Healthcare and Family 26    Services shall make the monthly directed payment to each   SB3751- 3 -LRB104 20592 KTG 34082 b1    provider entitled to directed payments under this Act by 2    no later than the last day of each month throughout each 3    State fiscal year.4            (A) (i) The monthly directed payment for a 5        community support team provider shall be calculated as 6        follows: The sum total number of individual Medicaid 7        users of community support team services delivered by 8        that provider throughout the base year, multiplied by 9        $4,200 per Medicaid user, divided into 12 equal 10        monthly payments for the State fiscal year. 11            (B) (ii) As used in this subparagraph, "user" 12        means an individual who received at least 200 units of 13        community support team services (H2016) during the 14        base year.15        (2) (B) For each State fiscal year, a monthly directed 16    payment shall be paid to each community mental health 17    provider of assertive community treatment services based 18    on the number of Medicaid users of assertive community 19    treatment services documented by Medicaid fee-for-service 20    and managed care encounter claims delivered by the 21    provider in the base year. 22            (A) (i) The monthly direct payment for an 23        assertive community treatment provider shall be 24        calculated as follows: The sum total number of 25        Medicaid users of assertive community treatment 26        services provided by that provider throughout the base   SB3751- 4 -LRB104 20592 KTG 34082 b1        year, multiplied by $6,000 per Medicaid user, divided 2        into 12 equal monthly payments for that State fiscal 3        year. 4            (B) (ii) As used in this subparagraph, "user" 5        means an individual that received at least 300 units 6        of assertive community treatment services during the 7        base year.8        (3) (C) The base year for directed payments under this 9    Section shall be calendar year 2019 for State Fiscal Year 10    2023 and State Fiscal Year 2024. For the State fiscal year 11    beginning on July 1, 2024, and for every State fiscal year 12    thereafter, the base year shall be the calendar year that 13    ended 18 months prior to the start of the State fiscal year 14    in which payments are made.15    (b-5) (b) Subject to federal approval, a one-time directed 16payment must be made in calendar year 2023 for community 17mental health services provided by community mental health 18providers. The one-time directed payment shall be for an 19amount appropriated for these purposes. The one-time directed 20payment shall be for services for Integrated Assessment and 21Treatment Planning and other intensive services, including, 22but not limited to, services for Mobile Crisis Response, 23crisis intervention, and medication monitoring. The amounts 24and services used for designing and distributing these 25one-time directed payments shall not be construed to require 26any future rate or funding increases for the same or other   SB3751- 5 -LRB104 20592 KTG 34082 b1mental health services. 2    (b-6) Subject to federal approval, for dates of service on 3and after July 1, 2026, the Medicaid reimbursement rates for 4Assertive Community Treatment and Community Support Team 5services shall be increased by an amount appropriated for the 6purposes enumerated in this Act. 7    (c) The following payment adjustments shall be made:8        (1) Subject to federal approval, beginning on January 9    1, 2024, the Department shall introduce rate increases to 10    behavioral health services no less than by the following 11    targeted pool for the specified services provided by 12    community mental health centers:13            (A) Mobile Crisis Response, $6,800,000;14            (B) Crisis Intervention, $4,000,000;15            (C) Integrative Assessment and Treatment Planning 16        services, $10,500,000;17            (D) Group Therapy, $1,200,000;18            (E) Family Therapy, $500,000;19            (F) Community Support Group, $4,000,000; and20            (G) Medication Monitoring, $3,000,000.21        (2) Rate increases shall be determined with 22    significant input from Illinois behavioral health trade 23    associations and advocates. The Department must use 24    service units delivered under the fee-for-service and 25    managed care programs by community mental health centers 26    during State Fiscal Year 2022. These services are used for   SB3751- 6 -LRB104 20592 KTG 34082 b1    distributing the targeted pools and setting rates but do 2    not prohibit the Department from paying providers not 3    enrolled as community mental health centers the same rate 4    if providing the same services.5    (d) Rate simplification for team-based services.6        (1) The Department shall work with stakeholders to 7    redesign reimbursement rates for behavioral health 8    team-based services established under the Rehabilitation 9    Option of the Illinois Medicaid State Plan supporting 10    individuals with chronic or complex behavioral health 11    conditions and crisis services. Subject to federal 12    approval, the redesigned rates shall seek to introduce 13    bundled payment systems that minimize provider claiming 14    activities while transitioning the focus of treatment 15    towards metrics and outcomes. Federally approved rate 16    models shall seek to ensure reimbursement levels are no 17    less than the State's total reimbursement for similar 18    services in calendar year 2023, including all service 19    level payments, add-ons, and all other payments specified 20    in this Section.21        (2) In State Fiscal Year 2024, the Department shall 22    identify an existing, or establish a new, Behavioral 23    Health Outcomes Stakeholder Workgroup to help inform the 24    identification of metrics and outcomes for team-based 25    services.26        (3) In State Fiscal Year 2025, subject to federal   SB3751- 7 -LRB104 20592 KTG 34082 b1    approval, the Department shall introduce a 2    pay-for-performance model for team-based services to be 3    informed by the Behavioral Health Outcomes Stakeholder 4    Workgroup.5(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23; 6103-102, eff. 7-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 82026.